Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1568.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


A. This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Oklahoma


Parental Decision-Making and Hepatitis B Immunization Act of 2026”.


B. The Legislature finds that:


1. The Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices (ACIP) has


updated its recommendations to provide for individual-based, shared

Req. No. 3489 Page 1


clinical decision-making between parents and health care providers


regarding administration of the hepatitis B vaccine, including the


so called “birth dose,” for infants born to women who test negative


for hepatitis B;


2. Under these recommendations, infants born to mothers who


test positive for hepatitis B or whose infection status is unknown


remain candidates for prompt post-exposure prophylaxis and


vaccination, while decisions for infants of hepatitis B–negative


mothers may be made on an individual basis, with initiation of the


vaccine series at or after two (2) months of age if parents elect to


vaccinate; and


3. Oklahoma law and regulation currently require birthing


hospitals and licensed midwives to implement procedures to ensure


administration of a universal hepatitis B birth dose to all live


infants within twelve (12) hours of birth, subject to documented


exemptions, which effectively conditions the exercise of parental


choice on affirmatively refusing the hospital-administered dose.


C. The purposes of this act are to:


1. Align state newborn hepatitis B vaccination requirements


with current ACIP guidance;


2. Clarify that hepatitis B immunization for eligible infants


and children may be administered in any lawful clinical setting and


is not required to occur in a hospital or birthing facility; and



Req. No. 3489 Page 2


3. Affirm and strengthen the fundamental right of parents and


legal guardians to make informed medical decisions for their


children in consultation with their chosen health care


professionals.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-511.1 of Title 63, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Notwithstanding any existing law or administrative rule to


the contrary, no statute, regulation, or policy of this state shall


be interpreted or applied to require that the hepatitis B birth dose


be administered in a hospital, birthing facility, or midwife


practice as a condition of compliance with state immunization


requirements for newborns or children, and hepatitis B vaccine doses


administered in any lawful clinical setting shall be deemed to


satisfy such requirements as provided by subsection D of this


section.


B. For infants born to women who test positive for hepatitis B


surface antigen or whose hepatitis B status is unknown at the time


of birth, birthing facilities shall continue to offer and are


authorized to administer appropriate hepatitis B immunoprophylaxis,


including hepatitis B vaccine, as a medically indicated standard of


care.


C. For infants born to women who test negative for hepatitis B,


the timing and location of initiation of the hepatitis B vaccine

Req. No. 3489 Page 3


series shall be determined through shared clinical decision-making


between the parent or legal guardian and the infant’s health care


provider, consistent with current Advisory Committee on Immunization


Practices (ACIP) recommendations.


D. Hepatitis B vaccine doses administered in any lawful


clinical setting including, but not limited to, a pediatric or


family medicine clinic, public health department clinic, tribal


clinic, or other licensed outpatient facility, shall be deemed to


satisfy any state law or regulation requiring hepatitis B


immunization of infants or children.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-511.2 of Title 63, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. No birthing facility, health care provider, or state or


local agency shall require administration of a hepatitis B birth


dose to an infant as a condition of discharge from a hospital or


birthing setting, or as a condition for the provision of any other


medical service to the mother or child, when the mother has tested


negative for hepatitis B.


B. Parents or legal guardians shall retain the right to decline


or defer administration of the hepatitis B birth dose for their


infant for any reason including, but not limited to, personal,


philosophical, or religious beliefs, without penalty under state law


and without adverse action in child welfare, custody, or other state

Req. No. 3489 Page 4


administered proceedings, provided that such decision is documented


in the medical record.


C. Birthing facilities and health care providers shall:


1. Inform parents or legal guardians of the current Advisory


Committee on Immunization Practices (ACIP) recommendations regarding


hepatitis B vaccination, including the options for timing and


setting of administration where the mother is hepatitis B-negative;


and


2. Obtain informed consent prior to administering any hepatitis


B vaccine dose to a newborn or child, except where emergency


treatment is medically necessary to prevent imminent serious harm


and consent cannot reasonably be obtained.


SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-511.3 of Title 63, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The State Commissioner of Health shall, within twelve (12)


months of the effective date of this act, amend rules governing


birthing facilities and licensed midwives to remove any requirement


that all live infants receive a universal hepatitis B birth dose


within twelve (12) hours of birth.


B. Such rules shall:


1. Preserve the obligation of birthing facilities to offer


hepatitis B vaccine and appropriate immunoprophylaxis to infants



Req. No. 3489 Page 5


born to mothers who are hepatitis B-positive or whose status is


unknown;


2. Recognize that administration of the hepatitis B vaccine


series may lawfully occur outside the hospital or birthing setting;


and


3. Incorporate parental shared clinical decision-making for


infants born to hepatitis B–negative mothers, consistent with the


most current Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices (ACIP)


recommendations in effect on the effective date of this act.


SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-511.4 of Title 63, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Nothing in this act shall be construed to mandate hepatitis


B vaccination of any infant or child beyond the requirements that


may be established by general Oklahoma school and child care


immunization laws, which remain subject to existing exemptions and


parental rights provisions.


B. In the event of any conflict between state hepatitis B


immunization regulations for newborns and the Advisory Committee on


Immunization Practices (ACIP) recommendations in effect on the


effective date of this act, the provisions of this act shall control


unless subsequently amended by the Legislature.


C. If any provision of this act or its application to any


person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not

Req. No. 3489 Page 6


affect other provisions or applications of the act that may be given


effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end


the provisions of this act are declared severable.


SECTION 6. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3489 DC 1/12/2026 7:46:49 PM





































Req. No. 3489 Page 7